Hawaii statutes.
§21-2 Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Hearing" means any meeting in the
course of an investigatory proceeding, other than a preliminary conference or
interview at which no testimony is taken under oath, conducted by an
investigating committee for the purpose of taking testimony or receiving other
evidence. A hearing may be open to the public or closed to the public.

"Investigating committee" means any
of the following which are authorized to compel the attendance and testimony of
witnesses or the production of books, records, papers, and documents for the
purpose of securing information on a specific subject for the use of the
legislature:

(1) A standing or special or select committee or
committee of the whole of either house of the legislature;

(2) A joint committee of both houses;

(3) An authorized subcommittee of a legislative
committee; and

(4) Any body created by law, the members of which may
include nonlegislators.

"Public hearing" means any hearing
open to the public, or the proceedings of which are made available to the
public. [L 1969, c 211, pt of §1]

Revision Note

Numeric designations deleted and definitions rearranged.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next